Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4155.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1278e. (1) By not later than April 1, 2026, the department shall publish on its website a list of recommended curriculum companies and assessment companies for use by school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies. The curricular programs developed by curriculum companies recommended by the department under this section must do all of the following: (a) Include curricula that align with this state's academic standards under this act and include comprehensive coverage of all required subject areas. Comprehensive coverage may include subject area coverage supplied by a combination of curriculum providers. (b) Provide evidence of effectiveness through independent research or other reliable data supporting improved student outcomes. (c) Include strategies for differentiating instruction and ensuring accessibility for all students, including students with disabilities. (d) Offer robust professional development and professional learning resources and ongoing support for educators. (e) Be available in digital and print formats, be compatible with multiple platforms, and comply with all applicable accessibility standards. (f) Allow for customization and flexibility to meet the specific needs of individual schools and school districts. (g) Provide clear and detailed information on all costs and licensing options. (h) Ensure the provision of high-quality, accurate, and unbiased content that is regularly reviewed and updated. (i) Offer comprehensive customer support and be willing to provide references from current users. (2) The department shall ensure that the assessment companies recommended under subsection (1) provide a variety of assessments that align with all state and federal requirements and include diagnostic, formative, and summative assessments. (3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) are in addition to any other requirements imposed by the department for inclusion on the list of recommended curriculum companies and assessment companies. (4) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy is not required to employ a curriculum company or assessment company or implement a curriculum developed by a company recommended by the department under subsection (1). (5) By not later than April 1, 2027, and each April 1 thereafter, the department shall update the list of recommended curriculum companies and assessment companies developed under subsection (1).